Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,234
Intervention.

(1) In any action under the Nebraska Emergency Planning and Community Right to Know Act, the State of Nebraska, if not a party, may intervene as a matter of right.

(2) In any action under the act, any person may intervene as a matter of right when such person has a direct interest which is or may be adversely affected by the action and the disposition of the action may, as a practical matter, impair or impede the person's ability to protect that interest.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 44.